Massachusetts, session 194th, H5516.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
1  SECTION 1. Chapter 24A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the 
2 following 13 sections:- 
3  Section 6. There shall be within the office, but not under its control, a Massachusetts 
4 condominium commission, hereafter called the commission, to be appointed by the governor, 
5 with the advice and consent of the council, consisting of 5 members, citizens of the 
6 commonwealth, 3 of whom shall be residential condominium owners with 1 representative of an 
7 association with less than 100 units. One of the appointees shall be a residential condominium 
8 manager. The governor shall designate the chair of the commission. As the term of office of a 
9 member of the commission expires, the member's successor shall be appointed by the governor, 
10 with like advice and consent, to serve for 5 years. Each member shall be eligible for 
11 reappointment and shall serve until the qualification of the member's successor. The governor 
12 may also, with like advice and consent, fill any vacancy in the commission for the unexpired 

2 of 12 13 portion of the term. For the purposes of this section and sections 7 through 18, the term 
14 “association” shall have the same meaning as the terms “organization of unit owners” or 
15 “association” and the term “condominium” shall have the same meaning as “condominium” set 
16 forth in section 1 of chapter 183A. 
17  Section 7. The commission shall hold at least 4 regular meetings each year and may hold 
18 special meetings as required. Time, place and notice of all meetings shall be as required by rules 
19 or by-laws made by the commission. A quorum shall consist of 3 members. In case of vacancy in 
20 the office or absence of the chair, the senior member shall perform the duties of the chair. A 
21 written record, which shall be open to public inspection shall be kept of all meetings and of the 
22 business transacted. 
23  Section 8. The commission may make such rules or by-laws, not inconsistent with law, as 
24 it may deem necessary in the performance of its duties. The commission shall have a seal. The 
25 commission shall annually render to the governor and the general court a report of its 
26 proceedings, which shall include an itemized statement of all receipts and expenses of the 
27 commission for the year. 
28  Section 9. Each member of the commission shall serve without compensation but shall be 
29 paid by the commonwealth the expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of official duties. 
30 The commission shall employ an executive director to discharge its official duties and shall fix 
31 the executive director's compensation, which shall be paid by the commonwealth. The office 
32 shall provide the commission with adequate office space and shall pay the expenses of the 
33 commission incurred in the performance of its duties. 

3 of 12 34  Section 10. The commission shall select a qualified individual to act as executive director 
35 and shall delegate full authority to the executive director to manage the affairs of the 
36 commission. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The executive 
37 director shall present to the commission for its approval annual budgets, staffing plans and 
38 operating plans. The executive director shall supervise the employees of the commission and 
39 shall have the power to hire and fire them. 
40  Section 11. (a) No person shall manage or hold himself out to the public as being able to 
41 perform, provide, or render management or administrative services to an association, including 
42 but not limited to: preparation of budgets and other financial documents; the collecting, 
43 controlling, disbursing, accounting or custody of common funds; obtaining insurance; 
44 conducting meetings of the organization of unit owners; arranging for and coordinating 
45 maintenance and repair; or otherwise overseeing the day to day operations of the condominium 
46 for the association unless licensed by the commission in accordance with sections 6 to 18, 
47 inclusive. For the purposes of said sections 6 through 18, the term “manager” shall have the same 
48 meaning as the term “manager” in section 1 of chapter 183A. 
49  (b) Each applicant for a license as a residential condominium manager shall furnish the 
50 commission with proof of satisfactory completion of the educational, training and experience 
51 requirements for licensure, including completion of an approved program of work experience 
52 and proof of having passed a licensing examination approved by the commission. 
53  (c) Applications for licenses and renewals thereof shall be submitted in accordance with 
54 procedures established by the commission. Pursuant to section 3B of chapter 7, the secretary of 
55 administration and finance shall ensure that a licensing fee shall be charged to all applicants in an 

4 of 12 56 amount sufficient to defray all administrative costs to the commonwealth associated with the 
57 licensure of condominium managers, but in no event shall the fee be less than $300. 
58  (d) The commission shall license as a residential condominium manager an applicant who 
59 meets the requirements set forth in this section. The commission shall issue to a manager a 
60 license. 
61  (e) A license shall be issued for a period of 2 years and shall be renewable on or before 
62 the last day of the month in an even-numbered year. Each licensee shall pay to the commission 
63 the license fee or renewal fee set by the secretary of administration and finance. The renewal 
64 month shall be determined by the commission to facilitate efficient completion of all renewal 
65 requests and avoid backlog. The renewal of a residential condominium manager license shall be 
66 contingent upon compliance with the continuing education requirements and standards of 
67 practice as determined by the commission and defined by rules and regulations. 
68  (f) To be eligible for licensure as a residential condominium manager, an applicant shall: 
69 (i) be of good moral character; (ii) have successfully completed high school or its equivalent; 
70 (iii) have successfully completed all pre-licensure education requirements approved by the 
71 commission; (iv) have passed a written or electronic competency examination offered or 
72 approved by the commission; provided that such examination shall demonstrate that the 
73 applicant has a fundamental knowledge of state and federal laws relating to the operation of all 
74 types of residential condominiums as defined in chapter 183A, proper preparation of association 
75 budgets, proper procedures for noticing and conducting association meetings, insurance matters 
76 relating to associations and management skills; and (v) pay the appropriate fee set by the 
77 secretary of administration and finance. 

5 of 12 78  Section 12. Upon payment to the commission of a fee and the submission of a written 
79 application provided by the commission, the commission shall issue a condominium manager 
80 license to a person who holds a valid license or registration issued by another jurisdiction, which 
81 has standards substantially equivalent to or exceeding the standards of the commonwealth, as 
82 determined by the commission. 
83  Section 13. (a) A licensed residential condominium manager engaged in the practice of 
84 managing a residential condominium shall secure, maintain and file with the commission 
85 satisfactory proof of a certificate of an errors and omissions policy, which shall be in a minimum 
86 amount of $250,000 in the aggregate. Every proof of an errors and omissions policy shall 
87 stipulate that cancellation or nonrenewal of the policy shall not be effective until at least 10 days' 
88 notice of intention to cancel or not renew has been received in writing by the commission. No 
89 condominium manager may manage a condominium unless the manager’s performance is 
90 covered by an errors and omissions policy of at least $250,000 in the aggregate. Such proof shall 
91 be deemed satisfactory if the policy is carried by the licensed company, partnership or franchise 
92 for which the condominium manager is a contracted employee and the condominium manager is 
93 specifically covered by such policy. 
94  (b) A licensed residential condominium manager shall promptly report to the insurance 
95 company any complaint filed against either the condominium manager or the condominium 
96 manager's company in a court of competent jurisdiction when the claim in the complaint is 
97 greater than the deductible on the condominium manager's errors and omissions insurance 
98 policy. 

6 of 12 99  (c) The commission shall investigate all complaints filed with the commission relating to 
100 the proper practice of condominium management and all complaints relating to a violation of the 
101 law or any rule or regulation of the commission. 
102  (d) The commission may, by a majority vote, after a hearing held subject to chapter 30A, 
103 deny, refuse renewal, limit, suspend or revoke the license of a residential condominium manager 
104 upon proof to the satisfaction of the commission that the holder thereof has: (i) committed fraud 
105 or misrepresentation in obtaining a license; (ii) been guilty of criminal conduct which the 
106 commission determines to be of such a nature as to render such a person unfit to practice as a 
107 licensed condominium manager, as evidenced by criminal proceedings which resulted in a 
108 conviction, guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere or an admission of sufficient facts; (iii) failed 
109 to report a claim forthwith to the insurance carrier as provided in this section; (iv) violated any 
110 rule or regulation of the commission; (v) failed to fulfill any continuing education requirements 
111 set out by the commission; (vi) violated any ethical standard which the commission determines 
112 to be of such a nature as to render such person unfit to practice as a condominium manager, such 
113 as: (1) attempting to limit liability for negligent or wrongful errors or omissions by use of a 
114 clause within a performance contract that limits the cost of damages for negligent or wrongful 
115 errors or omissions; or (2) managing a condominium without the appropriate errors and 
116 omissions insurance coverage. 
117  Section 14. (a) The commission may, by a majority vote and upon determination made 
118 after a hearing pursuant to chapter 30A, find that a residential condominium manager is liable for 
119 a violation of the provisions of sections 6 through 18, inclusive, and may impose the following 
120 fines and penalties: (i) suspend, revoke, cancel or place on probation the license of the 
121 condominium manager; (ii) reprimand or censure the licensee; (iii) order the licensee to complete 

7 of 12 122 continuing education or training or both as a condition of retention or future consideration or 
123 reinstatement of such license; (iv) order the licensee to participate in a drug or alcohol 
124 rehabilitation program or undergo drug testing or both as a condition of reinstatement of such 
125 license; (v) order the licensee to practice under appropriate supervision for a period of time to be 
126 determined by the commission as a condition of retention or future consideration of 
127 reinstatement of such license; (vi) order financial restitution, where appropriate; and (vii) assess 
128 an administrative penalty of not more than $1,000 for each violation. 
129  (b) Whoever, not being licensed as a residential condominium manager, holds themselves 
130 out as such or whoever, being licensed, impersonates another condominium manager or violates 
131 any rule or regulation made by the commission and renders services as a condominium manager, 
132 may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for each violation. Such civil penalty 
133 may be assessed by the commission after hearing and may be enforced by the courts of the 
134 commonwealth. 
135  (c) No action by a residential condominium manager for recovery of a fee for the 
136 performance of such services shall be maintained in the courts of the commonwealth unless the 
137 individual who performed the services was duly licensed at the time the fee was earned. An 
138 appeal of a license suspension, revocation, cancellation or other discipline shall be made to the 
139 superior court in Suffolk county based solely on the administrative record compiled at the 
140 commission hearing. 
141  Section 15. The commission shall develop, oversee and administer a mandatory 
142 education and training program for association board members pursuant to section 23 of chapter 
143 183A. 

8 of 12 144  Section 16. The commission shall develop policies and procedures to assist residential 
145 condominium unit owners, boards of board members, board members themselves, association 
146 managers and other affected parties to understand their rights and responsibilities as set forth in 
147 laws of the commonwealth and the condominium documents governing their respective 
148 association. 
149  Section 17. The commission shall coordinate and assist in the promulgation of 
150 educational materials; and to make recommendations for rules and procedures for the filing, 
151 investigation, and resolution of complaints filed by residential condominium unit owners, 
152 associations and managers; and to provide resources to assist members of boards of board 
153 members and officers of associations to carry out their powers and duties consistent with chapter 
154 183A, commission rules and the condominium documents governing the association. 
155  Section 18. The commission shall serve as a liaison between any executive office, or any 
156 relevant department, and unit owners, board members, association managers and other affected 
157 parties. 
158  SECTION 2. Chapter 93A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
159 section 11 the following section:- 
160  Section 11A. A governing body, board of trustees, manager or managing agent of an 
161 organization of residential condominium unit owners shall be a person engaging in the conduct 
162 of trade or commerce for any action taken on behalf of an organization of condominium owners 
163 organized pursuant to chapter 183A. 

9 of 12 164  SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 183A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
165 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting before the definition of "Building" the following 
166 definition:- 
167  “Board member”, a member of the governing body of the organization of unit owners of 
168 residential condominiums. 
169  SECTION 4. Said section 1 of said chapter 183A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
170 amended by inserting after the definition of "Land" the following definition:- 
171  "Manager", the managing agent, the trustees in a self-managed condominium, or any 
172 other person or entity who performs or renders management or administrative services to the 
173 organization of unit owners, including but not limited to preparation of budgets and other 
174 financial documents; the collecting, controlling, disbursing, accounting or custody of common 
175 funds; obtaining insurance; conducting meetings of the organization of unit owners; arranging 
176 for and coordinating maintenance and repair; or otherwise overseeing the day to day operations 
177 of the condominium for the organization of unit owners; provided that any such person or entity 
178 who performs or renders such management or such administrative services shall be a licensed 
179 condominium manager licensed pursuant to sections 6 to 18, inclusive, of chapter 24A. 
180  SECTION 5. Said section 1 of said chapter 183A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
181 amended by inserting after the definition of “By-laws” the following definition:- 
182  “Commission”, the Massachusetts condominium commission established by section 6 of 
183 chapter 24A. 

10 of 12 184  SECTION 6. Said section 1 of said chapter 183A, as so appearing, is hereby further 
185 amended, in line 64, by striking out the words “Organization of unit owners” and inserting in 
186 place thereof the following words:- “Organization of unit owners” or “association”. 
187  SECTION 7. Subsection (c) of section 10 of said chapter 183A, as so appearing, is 
188 hereby amended by inserting after the second paragraph the following paragraph:- 
189  A unit owner who is denied access to records is entitled to the actual damages or 
190 minimum damages for the association's willful failure to comply. Minimum damages are $50 per 
191 calendar day for up to 10 days, beginning on the 11th working day after receipt of the written 
192 request. The failure to permit inspection entitles any person prevailing in an enforcement action 
193 to recover reasonable attorney fees from the person in control of the records who, directly or 
194 indirectly, knowingly denied access to the records. If the requested records are posted on an 
195 association’s website, or are available for download through an application on a mobile device, 
196 the association may fulfill its obligations under this paragraph by directing to the website or the 
197 application all persons authorized to request access. 
198  SECTION 8. Said chapter 183A is hereby further amended by adding the following 2 
199 sections:- 
200  Section 24. (a) A board member, within 90 days after being elected or appointed to the 
201 board of the governing body of the organization of unit owners of a residential association, shall: 
202  (i) certify in writing to the secretary of the governing body of the association that: (1) the 
203 board member has read the by-laws and master deed and any amendments and current written 
204 policies; (2) the board member will work to uphold such documents and policies to the best of 

11 of 12 205 the board member's ability; and (3) the board member will faithfully discharge the board 
206 member's fiduciary responsibility to the association's members; and 
207  (ii) submit to the secretary of the association a certificate of having satisfactorily 
208 completed the educational curriculum administered by the commission or a commission-
209 approved residential condominium education provider. The educational curriculum shall be at 
210 least 4 hours long and include instruction on inspections, elections, recordkeeping, financial 
211 literacy and transparency, levying of fines and notice and meeting requirements within 1 year 
212 before or 90 days after the date of election or appointment. 
213  (b) One year after submission of the most recent written certification and educational 
214 certificate, and annually thereafter, a board member of a residential condominium association 
215 shall submit to the secretary of the association a certificate of having satisfactorily completed at 
216 least 1 hour of continuing education administered by the commission or a commission-approved 
217 condominium education provider, relating to any recent changes to this chapter and any related 
218 administrative rules during the past year. 
219  (c) A board member of an association who fails to timely file the written certification or 
220 educational certificate is suspended from service on the board until the board member complies 
221 with this section. 
222  (d) The board may temporarily fill the vacancy during the period of suspension. The 
223 board's secretary shall cause the association to retain a board member's written certification and 
224 educational certificate for inspection by the members for 7 years after a board member's election 
225 or the duration of the board member's uninterrupted tenure, whichever is longer. Failure to have 

12 of 12 226 such written certification or educational certificate on file does not affect the validity of any 
227 board action. 
228  Section 25. The actions of a governing body, board of trustees, manager or managing 
229 agent of an organization of residential condominium unit owners taken on behalf of or for unit 
230 owners, pursuant to this chapter, shall be deemed to be practices engaged in the conduct of trade 
231 or commerce pursuant to chapter 93A. 
232  SECTION 9. A manager of a residential condominium, as defined in section 1 of chapter 
233 183A of the General Laws, shall comply with the licensure requirements in section 11 of chapter 
234 24A of the General Laws by June 30, 2027. 
235  SECTION 10. A board member of an association of a residential condominium who was 
236 elected or appointed before July 1, 2026, shall comply with the written certification and 
237 educational certificate requirements in section 23 of chapter 183A of the General Laws by June 
238 30, 2027.